Utah statutes.
48-2e-904.   Amendment of foreign registration.

A registered foreign limited partnership shall deliver to the division for filing an amendment to its foreign registration statement if there is a change in:

(1)  the name of the foreign limited partnership;

(2)  the foreign limited partnership's jurisdiction of formation;

(3)  an address required by Subsection 48-2e-903(4); or

(4)  the information required by Subsection 48-2e-903(5).



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

